Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Insurance Producers
§ 26-9-207.
License. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Unless denied licensure pursuant to W.S.

26-9-211

, persons who have met the requirements of W.S.

26-9-205

and

26-9-206

shall be issued an insurance producer license. An insurance producer may receive qualification for a license in one (1) or more of the following lines of authority:

Life — insurance coverage on human lives including benefits of endowment and annuities, and may include benefits in the event of death or dismemberment by accident and benefits for disability income;

Accident and health or sickness or disability — insurance coverage for sickness, bodily injury or accidental death and may include benefits for disability income;

Property — insurance coverage for the direct or consequential loss or damage to property of every kind;

Casualty — insurance coverage against legal liability, including that for death, injury or disability or damage to real or personal property;

Variable life and variable annuity products — insurance coverage provided under variable life insurance contracts and variable annuities;

Personal lines — property and casualty insurance coverage sold to individuals and families for primarily noncommercial purposes;

Credit — limited line credit insurance;

Any other line of insurance permitted under state laws or regulations.

A licensee’s license shall remain in effect unless revoked or suspended if on or before the last day of the month of the licensee’s birthday in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license the continuation fee set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a) is paid, the continuing education requirements are met by the due date, a written request for continuation of the license is made to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner and the licensee remains in compliance with all other applicable provisions of this code. An insurance producer or surplus lines broker license issued to a business entity shall remain in effect unless revoked or suspended if on or before the last day of the month in which the license was effective in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license the continuation fee set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a) is paid, a written request for continuation of the license is made to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner and the licensee remains in compliance with all other applicable provisions of this code.

A licensee who allows his license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license without the necessity of passing a written examination. However, a penalty equal to the amount of the continuation fee shall be required in addition to the continuation fee for any continuation request received after the due date. A business entity insurance producer or surplus lines broker that allows its license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license, however, a penalty equal to the amount of the continuation fee shall be required in addition to the continuation fee for any continuation request received after the due date.

A licensee who is unable to comply with license renewal procedures due to military service or some other extenuating circumstance such as a long-term medical disability may request a waiver of those procedures. The producer may also request a waiver of any examination requirement or any other fine or sanction imposed for failure to comply with renewal procedures.

The license shall contain the licensee’s name, address, personal identification number, date of issuance, the lines of authority, the expiration date and any other information the commissioner deems necessary.

Licensees shall inform the commissioner by any means acceptable to the commissioner of a change of name, address, telephone number, email address or other contact information as defined by rule and regulation of the commissioner within thirty (30) days of the change.

The commissioner may contract with nongovernmental entities, including the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or any affiliates or subsidiaries that association oversees, to perform any ministerial functions, including the collection of fees, related to licensing that the commissioner and the nongovernmental entity may deem appropriate.

and (j) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 3.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2004, ch. 7, § 1; 2011, ch. 60, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 46, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

§ 26-9-208.
Nonresident licensing.

Unless denied licensure pursuant to W.S.

26-9-211

, a nonresident person shall receive a nonresident producer license if:

The person is currently licensed as a resident and is in good standing in his home state;

The person has submitted the proper request for licensure and has paid the fees required by W.S. 26-4-101(a);

The person has submitted or transmitted to the commissioner the application for licensure the person submitted to his home state, or in lieu of the same, a completed uniform application; and

The person’s home state awards nonresident producer licenses to residents of this state on the same basis.

The commissioner may verify the producer’s licensing status through the producer database maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries.

A nonresident producer who moves from one (1) state to another or a resident producer who moves from this state to another state shall file a change of address and provide certification from the new resident state within thirty (30) days of the change of legal residence. No fee or license application is required.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person licensed as a surplus lines producer in his home state shall receive a nonresident surplus lines producer license pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Except as to subsection (a) of this section, nothing in this section otherwise amends or supercedes any provision of chapter 11 of this code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person licensed as a limited line credit insurance or other type of limited lines producer in his home state shall receive a nonresident limited lines producer license, pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, granting the same scope of authority as granted under the license issued by the producer’s home state. For the purposes of this subsection, limited line insurance is any authority granted by the home state which restricts the authority of the license to less than the total authority prescribed in the associated major lines pursuant to W.S. 26-9-207(a)(i) through (vi).

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1.

Cross references. —

For other provisions as to appointment of the commissioner as attorney for acceptance of service of process, see §§

26-3-121

,

26-3-122

.

§ 26-9-209.
Exemption from examination.

An individual who applies for an insurance producer license in this state who was previously licensed for the same lines of authority in another state shall not be required to complete an examination. This exemption is only available if the person is currently licensed in that state or if the application is received within ninety (90) days of the cancellation of the applicant’s previous license and if the prior state issues a certification that, at the time of cancellation, the applicant was in good standing in that state or the state’s producer database records, maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries, indicate that the producer is or was licensed in good standing for the line of authority requested.

A person licensed as an insurance producer in another state who moves to this state shall make application within ninety (90) days of establishing legal residence to become a resident licensee pursuant to W.S.

26-9-206

. No examination shall be required of that person to obtain any line of authority previously held in the prior state except where the commissioner determines otherwise by regulation.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 123, § 3.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2004, ch. 7, § 1; 2011, ch. 60, § 2; 2013 ch. 123, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c), deleted “annually as of April 1” following “may be issued,” and substituted “the fee specified in W.S.

26-4-101

” for “an annual fee of ten dollars ($10.00)” in the second sentence; and inserted the present third sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (c), rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read: “No examination shall be required of persons representing public carriers who, in the course of that representation, solicit or sell insurance incidental to the transportation of persons or to the storage or transportation of property.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (c), which read: “No examination shall be required of persons who solicit, negotiate or sell insurance coverage for trip cancellation, trip interruption, baggage, life, sickness and accident, disability and personal effects when limited to a specific trip and sold in connection with transportation provided by a common carrier. Persons exempted from examination pursuant to this subsection may be issued a limited insurance representative license by the commissioner upon submission of an application approved by the commissioner and payment of the fee specified in W.S.

26-4-101

. A license issued under this subsection shall continue in force until expired, suspended, revoked or otherwise terminated, if the applicable continuation fee specified in W.S.

26-4-101

is paid to the commissioner, on or before the last day of the month of the licensee's birthday in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license. Licensees under this subsection shall be subject to the application requirements established by the commissioner, the provisions of W.S.

26-9-211

and chapter 13 of this code but shall not be subject to the other provisions of this code.”

§ 26-9-210.
Temporary licensing.

The commissioner may issue a temporary insurance producer license for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days without requiring an examination if the commissioner deems that the temporary license is necessary for the servicing of an insurance business in the following cases:

To the surviving spouse or court-appointed personal representative of a licensed insurance producer who dies or becomes mentally or physically disabled to allow adequate time for the sale of the insurance business owned by the producer or for the recovery or return of the producer to the business or to provide for the training and licensing of new personnel to operate the producer’s business;

To a member or employee of a business entity licensed as an insurance producer, upon the death or disability of an individual designated in the business entity application or the license;

To the designee of a licensed insurance producer entering active service in the armed forces of the United States; or

In any other circumstance where the commissioner deems that the public interest will best be served by the issuance of this license.

The commissioner may by order limit the authority of any temporary licensee in any way deemed necessary to protect insureds and the public. The commissioner may require the temporary licensee to have a suitable sponsor who is a licensed producer or insurer and who assumes responsibility for all acts of the temporary licensee and may impose other similar requirements designed to protect insureds and the public. The commissioner may by order revoke a temporary license if the interest of insureds or the public are endangered. A temporary license may not continue after the owner or the personal representative disposes of the business.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 26-9-211.
License denial, nonrenewal or revocation.

The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and in accordance with W.S.

26-2-125

through

26-2-129

, place on probation, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew an insurance producer’s license or other license issued under this code, or may levy a civil penalty in accordance with W.S.

26-1-107

or any combination of actions, for any one (1) or more of the following causes:

Providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete or materially untrue information in the license application;

Violating any insurance laws, or violating any regulation, subpoena or order of the commissioner or of another state’s insurance commissioner;

Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license through misrepresentation or fraud;

Improperly withholding, misappropriating or converting any monies or properties received in the course of doing insurance business;

Intentionally misrepresenting the terms of an actual or proposed insurance contract or application for insurance;

Having been convicted of a felony that relates to the insurance profession or to the ability to practice as an insurance producer. For agents whose home state of licensure is not Wyoming, the commissioner may rely on licensure and disciplinary actions by the agent’s home state of licensure;

Having admitted or been found to have committed any insurance unfair trade practice or fraud;

Using fraudulent, coercive or dishonest practices, or demonstrating incompetence, untrustworthiness or financial irresponsibility in the conduct of business in this state or elsewhere;

Having an insurance producer license, or its equivalent, denied, suspended or revoked in any other state, province, district or territory;

Forging another’s name to an application for insurance or to any document related to an insurance transaction;

Improperly using notes or any other reference material to complete an examination for an insurance license;

Failing to comply with an administrative or court order imposing a child support obligation;

Failing to maintain a valid home state license.

The license of a business entity may be suspended, revoked or refused if the commissioner finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that an individual licensee’s violation was known by one (1) or more of the partners, officers or managers acting on behalf of the business entity and the violation was neither reported to the commissioner nor corrective action taken.

The commissioner shall retain the authority to enforce the provisions of and impose any penalty or remedy authorized by this chapter and this code against any person who is under investigation for or charged with a violation of this chapter or this code even if the person’s license or registration has been surrendered or has lapsed by operation of law.

The commissioner may, after providing appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing as required in subsection (a) of this section, levy against any person against whom action has been taken by the commissioner the reasonable costs of investigation and administrative proceedings, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).

For persons for whom Wyoming is the home state of licensure, if the commissioner is aware at the time the commissioner takes an action under subsection (a) of this section that a person will require the written consent of an insurance regulatory official to engage in the business of insurance pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 1033 and the result of the action under subsection (a) of this section is that the person will receive or retain a license under this code, the commissioner shall, upon request, issue the written consent.

If an employer becomes aware that an employee who is engaged in the business of insurance needs the commissioner’s consent to continue to engage in the business of insurance, the employer may direct the employee to obtain the necessary consent and, if the consent is denied, shall take action so that the employee is not engaged in the business of insurance. In cases arising under this subsection the commissioner shall give special weight to evidence, including statements from the employer, as to whether the employee has or has not engaged in any activity that relates to the offense requiring the written consent and that relates adversely to the insurance profession.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2004, ch. 7, § 1; 2015 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, inserted “or other license issued under this code” in the introductory paragraph of (a).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (d).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(xiii) and made a related change.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(vi), added “that relates to the insurance profession or to the ability to practice as an insurance producer. For agents whose home state of licensure is not Wyoming, the commissioner may rely on licensure and disciplinary actions by the agent’s home state of licensure” at the end; and added (e) and (f).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Commissioner's right to cancel license under former statute. —

See State v. Loucks, 32 Wyo. 26, 228 P. 632,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(1924).

§ 26-9-212.
Commissions.

An insurer or insurance producer shall not pay a commission, service fee, brokerage or other valuable consideration to a person for selling, soliciting or negotiating insurance in this state if that person is required to be licensed under this chapter and is not so licensed.

A person shall not accept a commission, service fee, brokerage or other valuable consideration for selling, soliciting or negotiating insurance in this state if that person is required to be licensed under this chapter and is not so licensed.

Renewal or other deferred commissions may be paid to a person for selling, soliciting or negotiating insurance in this state if the person was required to be licensed under this chapter at the time of the sale, solicitation or negotiation and was so licensed at that time.

An insurer or insurance producer may pay or assign commissions, brokerages or other valuable consideration to an insurance agency or to persons who do not sell, solicit or negotiate insurance in this state, unless the payment would violate W.S.

26-13-110

or

26-13-112

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 26-9-213.
Appointments.

An insurance producer shall not act as an agent of an insurer unless the insurance producer becomes an appointed agent of that insurer. An insurance producer who is not acting as an agent of an insurer is not required to become appointed.

To appoint a producer as its agent, the appointing insurer shall file, in a format approved by the commissioner, a notice of appointment within fifteen (15) days from the date the agency contract is executed or the first insurance application is submitted. An insurer may also elect to appoint a producer to all or some insurers within the insurer’s holding company system or group by the filing of a single appointment request.

Upon receipt of the notice of appointment, the commissioner shall verify within a reasonable time that the insurance producer is eligible for appointment. If the insurance producer is determined to be ineligible for appointment, the commissioner shall notify the insurer.

An insurer shall pay an appointment fee, in the amount set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a), for each insurance producer appointed by the insurer.

An insurer shall remit, on or before March 31 and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, an annual continuation appointment fee in the amount set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a).

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2004, ch. 7, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (d), substituted “an appointment fee” for “a nonrefundable appointment fee”; and, in (e), inserted “on or before March 31 and” and deleted “nonrefundable” preceding “continuation appointment fee.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is termination of insurance agency contract wrongful, so as to make insurer liable to agent, 5 ALR4th 1080.

§ 26-9-214.
Notification to commissioner of termination.

An insurer or authorized representative of the insurer that terminates the appointment, employment, contract or other insurance business relationship with a producer for any reason shall notify the commissioner within thirty (30) days following the effective date of the termination, using a format prescribed by the commissioner. Upon written request of the commissioner, the insurer shall provide additional information, documents, records or other data pertaining to the termination or activity of the producer.

The insurer or the authorized representative of the insurer shall promptly notify the commissioner in a format acceptable to the commissioner if, upon further review or investigation, the insurer discovers additional information that would have been reportable to the commissioner under subsection (a) of this section had the insurer known of its existence.

Within fifteen (15) days after making the notification required by subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the insurer shall mail a copy of the notification to the producer at his last known address.

Within thirty (30) days after the producer has received the original or additional notification, the producer may file written comments concerning the substance of the notification with the commissioner. The producer shall, by the same means, simultaneously send a copy of the comments to the reporting insurer, and the comments shall be part of the commissioner’s file and accompany every copy of a report distributed or disclosed for any reason about the producer as permitted under subsection (e) or (f) of this section.

Any documents, materials or other information in the control or possession of the department that is furnished by an insurer, producer or an employee or agent thereof acting on behalf of the insurer or producer, or obtained by the commissioner in an investigation pursuant to this section shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action. The commissioner is authorized to use the documents, materials or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the commissioner’s duties. Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents, materials or other information while acting under the authority of the commissioner shall be permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential documents, materials or information subject to this subsection or subsection (f) of this section. In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner’s duties under this code, the commissioner:

May share documents, materials or other information, including the confidential and privileged documents, materials or information subject to this subsection, with other state, federal and international regulatory agencies, with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries, and with state, federal and international law enforcement authorities, provided that the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the document, material or other information;

May receive documents, materials or information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials or information, from the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries and from regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material or information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material or information; and

May enter into agreements governing sharing and use of information consistent with this subsection.

No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials or information shall occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsection (e) of this section. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the commissioner from releasing final, adjudicated actions including termination causes to a database or other clearinghouse service maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries.

An insurer, the authorized representative of the insurer, or producer that fails to report as required under the provisions of this section or that is found to have reported with actual malice by a court of competent jurisdiction may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, have its license or certificate of authority suspended or revoked and may be fined in accordance with W.S.

26-1-107

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is termination of insurance agency contract wrongful, so as to make insurer liable to agent, 5 ALR4th 1080.

§ 26-9-215.
Reciprocity.

The commissioner shall waive any requirements for a nonresident license applicant with a valid license from his home state, except the requirements imposed by W.S.

26-9-208

, if the applicant’s home state awards nonresident licenses to residents of this state on the same basis.

In order to carry out the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the commissioner may negotiate and enter into reciprocal arrangements with the insurance supervisory official of any other state or province.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 26-9-216.
Reporting of actions. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

A resident or nonresident insurance producer shall report to the commissioner any administrative action taken against the producer in another jurisdiction or by another governmental agency in this state within thirty (30) days of the final disposition of the matter. This report shall include a copy of the order, consent to order or other relevant legal documents.

Within thirty (30) days of the initial pretrial hearing date, a resident or nonresident insurance producer shall report to the commissioner any criminal prosecution of the producer taken in any jurisdiction. The report shall include a copy of the initial complaint filed, the order resulting from the hearing and any other relevant legal documents.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1.

The 2022 amendment,

effective January 1, 2023, substituted “licensee” for “resident or nonresident insurance producer” in the first sentences of (a) and (b).

§
26-9-216.
Reporting of actions. [Effective January 1, 2023]

A licensee shall report to the commissioner any administrative action taken against the producer in another jurisdiction or by another governmental agency in this state within thirty (30) days of the final disposition of the matter. This report shall include a copy of the order, consent to order or other relevant legal documents.

Within thirty (30) days of the initial pretrial hearing date, a licensee shall report to the commissioner any criminal prosecution of the producer taken in any jurisdiction. The report shall include a copy of the initial complaint filed, the order resulting from the hearing and any other relevant legal documents.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2022 ch. 46, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

§ 26-9-217.
Regulations; limitation.

The commissioner may, in accordance with W.S.

26-2-110

promulgate reasonable regulations as are necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 43 § 1.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2007, ch. 43, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former subsection (b), which read: “Unless specifically reauthorized by the legislature prior to July 1, 2007, rules and regulations promulgated under subsection (a) of this section prior to July 1, 2007, shall on and after July 1, 2007, be null and void and of no effect and shall not be enforceable.”

§ 26-9-218.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 1, 2004, ch. 7, § 1, related to service representatives.

Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 26-9-219.
Adjuster's license; exception; notification.

Application for license as an adjuster shall be made to the commissioner on forms he prescribes and furnishes. The commissioner shall issue the license as to qualified individuals upon payment of the license application fee stated in W.S.

26-4-101

. An adjuster may qualify for a license in one (1) or more of the following lines of insurance:

Property insurance, as defined in W.S.

26-5-104

;

Casualty insurance, as defined in W.S.

26-5-106

;

Crop insurance, as defined in W.S. 26-9-202(a)(xxi).

To be licensed as an adjuster the applicant shall:

Be an adult;

Be a resident of Wyoming or of another state which permits residents of Wyoming to act as adjusters in that state;

Be a full-time salaried employee of a licensed adjuster or a graduate of a recognized law school, or have had experience or special education or training in the handling of loss claims under insurance contracts of sufficient duration and extent to make him competent to fulfill the responsibilities of an adjuster;

Be trustworthy and of good reputation;

Have and maintain an office accessible to the public and keep therein the usual and customary records in paper, electronic or other appropriate format, pertaining to transactions under the license;

Within one (1) year prior to submitting the application for the license, have taken and passed a written examination in a form prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may waive written examination of a nonresident applicant if the applicant is licensed as an adjuster in his home state, is in good standing in his home state and his home state grants this state’s resident adjusters a similar privilege; and

If being licensed as a resident, have provided the commissioner fingerprints and other information and permission necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided in W.S. 7-19-201(a). The cost of the criminal history record background check shall be paid by the applicant.

A Wyoming adjuster’s license is required of any adjuster who by physical appearance or through electronic or other means, acts in this state on behalf of an insurer for the purpose of either investigating and negotiating settlements relative to insurance claims or applying the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions, or both, arising under property and casualty insurance contracts, unless the loss is of an unusual, uncommon or unique nature requiring special expertise or knowledge not readily available among adjusters licensed in this state, or for the adjustment of a series of losses resulting from a catastrophe common to those losses. Any insurer on whose behalf an adjuster who is not licensed in Wyoming either investigates and negotiates settlements relative to insurance claims or applies the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions, or both, arising under property and casualty insurance contracts, whether by physical appearance or through electronic or other means, shall notify the commissioner of such action prior to the unlicensed adjuster acting in this state.

If the state in which the adjuster maintains his principal place of residency or principal place of business does not license adjusters for the line of authority being applied for, the adjuster shall designate his home state, which may be any state in which the adjuster is licensed and in good standing and which state meets licensure requirements similar to the requirements of the state of Wyoming as determined by the commissioner.

For purposes of this section, “home state” means the District of Columbia and any state or territory of the United States in which an adjuster maintains his principal place of residence or business and is licensed to act as a resident adjuster.

This section shall not apply to an individual who:

Collects claim information from, or furnishes claim information to, insureds or claimants for portable electronic device insurance claims;

Conducts portable electronic device insurance claim data entry, including entering data into an automated claims adjudication system; and

Is supervised by a licensed adjuster, or licensed agent who is exempt from licensure as an adjuster pursuant to W.S. 26-1-102(a)(i). The agent or adjuster shall not supervise more than twenty-five (25) persons who are exempted under this subsection.

For purposes of subsection (f) of this section:

“Automated claims adjudication system” means a preprogrammed computer system which is designed for the collection, data entry, calculation and initial resolution of portable electronic device insurance claims;

“Portable electronic device insurance claim” means a claim filed by an insured or claimant to receive benefits under a portable electronic device insurance contract for an electronic device and its accessories that are portable in nature and which must be easily carried or conveyed by hand.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 195; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-195; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-143; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1985, ch. 63, § 1; 1993, ch. 97, § 1; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 26-9-135; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3; 2011, ch. 55, § 1; ch. 60, § 2; 2015 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 46, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 55 § 1, effective July 1, 2011, added (b)(vii), and made related changes.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 60 § 2, effective July 1, 2011, added (d) and (e).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (f) and (g).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, at the end of the introductory language of (a), inserted “An adjuster may qualify for a license in one (1) or more of the following lines of insurance:”; and added (a)(i) through (a)(iii).

The 2022 amendment,

in (c), added “either” preceding “investigating,” substituted “and negotiating settlements relative to insurance claims or applying the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions, or both, arising under property and casualty insurance contracts,” for “or making adjustment of a particular loss under an insurance policy,” in the second sentence, added “either” preceding “investigates,” and substituted “and negotiates settlements relative to insurance claims or applies the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions, or both, arising under property and casualty insurance contracts,” for “or adjusts a loss in this state.”

Laws 2022, ch. 46, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly codified as § 26-9-135.

§ 26-9-220.
Insurance consultants.

No person shall be held out to the public as an insurance consultant for hire unless a license as such has been issued in accordance with this section.

An application for a license to act as an insurance consultant for hire shall be made to the commissioner on forms he prescribes. The commissioner shall require that the applicant, within one (1) year prior to submitting the application for the license, have taken and passed a written examination in a form prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may waive written examination of a nonresident applicant if the applicant is licensed as a consultant in his home state, is in good standing in his home state and his home state grants this state’s resident consultants a similar privilege. The commissioner may conduct investigations concerning the applicant’s qualifications, residence, business affiliations and any other matter he deems necessary to determine compliance with this chapter or for the public’s protection. The applicant shall provide the commissioner fingerprints and other information and permission necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided in W.S. 7-19-201(a). The cost of the criminal history record background check shall be paid by the applicant.

The commissioner shall collect an application fee, a fee for the license, if issued, and a renewal fee, as provided in W.S.

26-4-101

. No license is valid for longer than twenty-four (24) months. A license may be renewed in the same manner as an insurance producer’s license.

All provisions of this chapter apply to licensees under this section to the extent that they are not in conflict with this section.

This section does not apply to licensed attorneys.

An insurance producer who is also licensed as a consultant under this section shall not act in the dual capacity of an insurance producer and a consultant in the same insurance transaction.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 162, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-147; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1993, ch. 97, § 1; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 26-9-139; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3; 2004, ch. 7, § 1; 2011, ch. 55, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c), substituted “an application fee” for “a nonrefundable application fee,” “a renewal fee” for “an annual renewal fee,” and “twenty-four (24) months” for “twelve (12) months”; and deleted “annually” following “may be renewed.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), added the present last two sentences.

Editor's notes. —

This section was formerly codified as § 26-9-139.

§ 26-9-221.
Limited license. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 17, § 1; 1993, ch. 97, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-140; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3; 2004, ch. 7, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-9-222.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 108, § 1, W.S. 1977, § 26-9-141, Rev. W.S. 1977, § 26-9-142, Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3, related to insurance marketers, requirements, penalties, and rulemaking authority.

Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 26-9-223.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 7, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 184, required that brokers file a bond.

Laws 2004, ch. 7, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 26-9-224.
Scope of broker's authority; broker's commissions.

Any insurance producer acting in the capacity of a broker is not an agent or other representative of an insurer and does not have power by his own acts to obligate the insurer upon any risk or by any insurance transaction.

An insurer or insurance producer has the right to pay to an insurance producer acting in the capacity of a broker and licensed under this chapter the customary commissions upon insurance placed through the producer acting as a broker.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 185; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-185; W.S. 1977, § 26-9-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 26-9-125; Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 3.

Editor's notes. —
